Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.078

Judicial review in accordance with administrative procedure act.

Judicial review of any final decision and order by the director is governed by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1989 c 175 s 88; 1969 c 128 s 16; 1963 c 174 s 18; 1953 c 200 s 20; 1951 c 50 s 14. Formerly RCW 41.40.420.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Severability—1969 c 128: See note following RCW 41.40.010.